Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1921YH (2) 91 lh/ko H.F. 226 Section 1. UNIVERSITY OF IOWA HOSPITALS AND CLINICS ââ 1 ONCOLOGY RESEARCH. There is appropriated from the general 2 fund of the state to the state board of regents for the fiscal 3 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 4 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 5 used for oncology research at the university of Iowa hospitals 6 and clinics: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,000,000 8